Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 15.
Teachers, Officers and Employees.

Article 5.

Interstate Agreement on Qualification of Educational Personnel.

22.1-316.Agreement entered into and enacted into law; form of agreement.

22.1-317.Superintendent of Public Instruction to be "designated state official."

22.1-318.Filing and publication of contracts made pursuant to Agreement.